tex/context/patterns/lang-nl.hyp
% context hyphenation file, see lang-all.xml for original comment

% source of data: nehyph96.tex

% begin description data

% <!-- copied from lang-all.xml
% 
% <?xml version='1.0' standalone='yes'?>
% 
% <description language='nl'>
%     <sourcefile>nehyph96.tex</sourcefile>
%     <title>TeX hyphenation patterns for the Dutch language</title>
%     <copyright>
%         <year>1996</year>
%         <owner> Piet Tutelaers (P.T.H.Tutelaers@tue.nl)</owner>
%         <comment>8-bit hyphenation patterns for TeX based upon the new Dutch
%           spelling, officially since 1 August 1996. These patterns follow
%           the new hyphenation rules in the `Woordenlijst Nederlandse
%           Taal, SDU Uitgevers, Den Haag 1995' (the so called `Groene
%           Boekje') described in section 5.2 (Het afbreekteken)</comment>
%     </copyright>
% </description>
% 
% end of copy -->

% end description data

% begin hyphenation data

\hyphenation {
aan-dachts-trek-ker
aan-dachts-trek-kers
acht-en-der
acht-en-ders
acht-en-der-tig
acht-en-der-tig-ste
be-heers-ta-ken
be-scherm-en-gel
be-scherm-en-ge-len
be-stuurs-la-gen
be-stuurs-ta-ken
bij-stands-trek-ker
bij-stands-trek-kers
bui-ten-an-ten-ne
bui-ten-an-ten-nes
don-der-aal
han-dels-taal
her-e-nen
ket-ting-ste-ken
lands-taal
meest-al
mi-nis-ters-por-te-feuil-le
mi-nis-ters-por-te-feuil-les
ont-hoof-din-gen
pa-ling-ste-ken
rechts-taal
schil-ders-ta-lent
sou-ve-niertje
sou-ve-niertjes
spie-gel-ei
ver-en-gels-te
ver-hol-lands-te
ver-in-lands-te
ver-kinds-te
ver-ne-der-lands-te
ver-rechts-te
ver-steeds-te
wals-te
wa-ter-staats-in-ge-ni-eur
wa-ter-staats-in-ge-ni-eurs
}

% end hyphenation data
